Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric vehicle charging system” means an  electrical system or device used solely
for the delivery of electrical current for the purpose of charging one or more electric vehi-
cles.
(b) “Equivalent  training program” means a registered apprenticeship or continuing edu-
cation electrician program for  the installation of an electric vehicle charging system that is
developed in accordance with a national guideline  standard approved by the United States
Department of Labor, in consultation with the United States Department of Transportation,
and approved by the Electrical and Elevator Board.
(c) “State  agency” means any state office, department, division, bureau, board or com-
mission or any other state agency.
(2) A state agency that authorizes or funds,  in whole or in part, the installation of an
electric vehicle charging system to be located on the customer’s side of the  meter shall re-
quire as a condition of the authorization or funding that:
(a) The electric vehicle charging system be installed by a contractor  or contractors who
hold all licenses legally required to perform the electrical installation work;
(b) The electric vehicle  charging system be installed by a contractor or contractors who
hold an Electric Vehicle Infrastructure  Training Program or equivalent training program
certification; and
(c) One or more electricians who hold an Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training  Pro-
gram or equivalent training program certification  supervise or participate in the installation
work for the periods during which electrical installation work is being performed.
(3) The requirements under this section do not apply to  the installation of an electric
vehicle charging system for a single-family dwelling, townhouse or multifamily  residential
building with four or fewer residential units.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric vehicle charging system” means an electrical system or  device used solely for the
delivery of electrical current for the purpose of charging one or more electric vehicles.
(b) “Equivalent training program” means a  registered apprenticeship or continuing education
electrician program for the installation of an electric vehicle charging system that is developed  in
Enrolled Senate Bill 582 (SB 582-B) Page 1
accordance with a national guideline standard approved by the United States  Department of Labor,
in consultation  with the United States Department of Transportation, and approved by the Electrical
and Elevator Board.
(c) “State agency” means any state office, department, division,  bureau, board or commission or
any other state agency.
(2)(a) A state agency that authorizes or funds, in whole or  in part, the installation of an electric
vehicle charging system to be located on the  customer’s side of the meter shall require as a condi-
tion of the authorization or funding that:
[(a)] (A) The electric vehicle charging system be installed  by a contractor or contractors who
hold all licenses legally required to perform the electrical installation work;
[(b)] (B) The electric vehicle charging system be  installed by a contractor or contractors who
hold an  Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program or equivalent training program certif-
ication; and
[(c)] (C) One or more electricians who hold an Electric Vehicle  Infrastructure Training Program
or equivalent training  program certification supervise or participate in the installation work for the
periods during which electrical installation work is being performed.
(b) In addition to the requirements under paragraph  (a) of this subsection, when the in-
stallation is for an electric vehicle charging system to be located on the  customer’s side of
the meter that will supply 25 or more kilowatts to an  electric vehicle, the state agency shall
require that at  least 25 percent of electricians who are present and working on the installa-
tion hold Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program or equivalent  training program
certifications.
(3) The requirements under this section do not apply to the installation of an electric  vehicle
charging system for a single-family dwelling, townhouse or multifamily residential  building with four
or fewer residential units.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section, “equivalent training program” has the  meaning
given that term in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Electrical and Elevator Board shall approve the Electric  Vehicle Infrastructure
Training Program (EVITP), and review equivalent  training programs for consideration, as a
continuing education program that meets the continuing education standards established by
the board under ORS 479.680 (1).
(3) The board shall, on an annual basis, request from the EVITP provider  information
on the number of electricians who have signed up  for the course, completed the course and
passed the certification exam.
(4) The board may audit the EVITP to ensure that  the EVITP includes the most current
national electrical codes and best practices for the installation of electrical  vehicle charging
systems.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “equivalent training program” has the meaning
given that term in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to section 1 of this 2023 Act by section 2 of  this 2023 Act become
operative on the day after the date the Electrical and Elevator Board  certifies that 500 in-
dividuals in the state have completed:
(a) The Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program  (EVITP) and passed the EVITP
certification exam; or
(b) An equivalent training program and passed the  equivalent training program certif-
ication exam.
(3) The board shall notify the appropriate committees of  the Legislative Assembly related
to consumer and business services upon certifying that 500 individuals in the state have
completed:
(a) The EVITP and passed the EVITP certification exam; or
(b) An equivalent training program and passed the  equivalent training program certif-
ication exam.
Enrolled Senate Bill 582 (SB 582-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 582 (SB 582-B) Page 3